Hawaii statutes.
C. University Equipment

[§304A-2651] University of Hawaii equipment. The board of regents may define or establish the value, useful life, and
any other characteristic of the university's nonexpendable, tangible personal
property, for all purposes for which these characteristics must be defined or
established, including inventory and surplus property control and the
preparation of financial statements, but excluding the determination of cost
elements related to the issuance of general obligation bonds. [L 2006, c 75, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next